and.noun.lexd
PATTERNS
NounAbs [<n>:] Abs
NounObl [<n>:] [<obl>:] (NounInfl) | (NounInflEssive Elative?)

LEXICON NounAbs
берка # змея
устул #стул

LEXICON NounObl
берка:берку # змея
устул:устулу # стул

LEXICON Abs
<abs>:

LEXICON NounInfl
<erg>:ди
<ins>:хъи
<dat>:й
<dat>:лъу
<sub><lative>:лIи
<super><lative>:ъо
<ad><lative>:хо

LEXICON NounInflEssive
<super><essive>:ъа
<sub><essive>:лIи
<ad><essive>:ха

LEXICON Elative
<elative>:кку
